New Jersey, session 221, A2543.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The administrative officer shall memorialize any conditions established by a municipal agency on each application for development or zoning variance in a permanent record, and any recording fee as may be provided by ordinance or regulation shall be paid by an applicant.  The record shall be kept in the office of the municipal clerk, and a copy shall be provided to an applicant.  Any condition memorialized in a permanent record by the administrative officer shall be considered a document affecting the title to real property, and shall be delivered for recording by the administrative officer in a manner consonant with P.L.2011, c.217 (N.J.S.46:26A-1 et al.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.